Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Nonprofit Fair Asset Protection Act

48-53-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Nonprofit Fair Asset Protection Act.”

Acts 2018, ch. 769, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning protecting assets of nonprofit corporations, see Acts 2018, ch. 769.

48-53-202. Nonprofit fair asset protection.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, it is unlawful for:

A national nonprofit corporation that has received a charter under 36 U.S.C. Subt. II, Pt. B, to terminate, revoke, suspend, or fail to renew a license or charter affiliating a Tennessee nonprofit corporation with the national nonprofit corporation absent good cause;

A national nonprofit corporation that has received a charter under 36 U.S.C. Subt. II, Pt. B, to discriminate against a licensed or chartered affiliated Tennessee nonprofit corporation by imposing requirements not imposed on other similarly situated affiliates of the national nonprofit corporation; or

A national nonprofit corporation that has received a charter under 36 U.S.C. Subt. II, Pt. B, to act indirectly to accomplish what would be otherwise prohibited under this part.

Acts 2018, ch. 769, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning protecting assets of nonprofit corporations, see Acts 2018, ch. 769.

48-53-203. “Good cause” defined.

For the purpose of this part, “good cause” means to exclude any refusal or failure by the Tennessee nonprofit corporation to make purchases of or to contract to make purchases of goods or services where the board of directors of the Tennessee nonprofit corporation determines, according to the standards set forth in § 48-58-301, that making a purchase or contracting to make a purchase is not in the best interest of the Tennessee nonprofit corporation or is commercially unreasonable.

Acts 2018, ch. 769, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning protecting assets of nonprofit corporations, see Acts 2018, ch. 769.

48-53-204. Violations — Remedies.

Any condition, stipulation, provision, or term of any agreement that is in conflict with this part or that would purport to waive or restrict the application of any provision of this part is void and unenforceable.

Nothing in this part abrogates or amends the standards for directors set forth in § 48-58-301.

In addition to any other remedies or rights of actions, a Tennessee nonprofit corporation that is injured by a violation or threatened violation of this part may bring a private right of action for injunctive relief and to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees if the Tennessee nonprofit corporation is the prevailing party in the action.

All ordinances, resolutions, rules, or requirements of any type that are in conflict with this part are void and unenforceable.

Acts 2018, ch. 769, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning protecting assets of nonprofit corporations, see Acts 2018, ch. 769.